California statutes. Civil Code
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person to require, demand, or cause to make payable any payment of money, including, but not limited to, “key money,” however denominated, or the lessor’s attorney’s fees reasonably incurred in preparing the lease or rental agreement, as a condition of initiating, continuing, or renewing a lease or rental agreement, unless the amount of payment
is stated in the written lease or rental agreement.

(c) Any person who requires, demands, or causes to make payable any payment in violation of subdivision (a), shall be subject to civil penalty of three times the amount of actual damages proximately suffered by the person seeking to obtain the lease or rental of real property, and the person so damaged shall be entitled to an award of costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees, reasonable incurred in connection with obtaining the civil penalty.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the advance payment of rent, if the amount and character of the payment are clearly stated in a written lease or rental agreement.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any person from charging a reasonable amount for the purpose of conducting reasonable business activity in
connection with initiating, continuing, or renewing a lease or rental agreement for nonresidential real property, including, but not limited to, verifying creditworthiness or qualifications of any person seeking to initiate, continue, or renew a lease or rental agreement for any use other than residential use, or cleaning fees, reasonably incurred in connection with the hiring of the real property.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person from increasing a tenant’s rent for nonresidential real property in order to recover building operating costs incurred on behalf of the tenant, if the right to the rent, the method of calculating the increase, and the period of time covered by the increase is stated in the lease or rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.9.

(a) A landlord of a commercial real property shall not charge a qualified commercial tenant a fee to recover building operating costs unless all of the following apply:

(1) The building operating costs are allocated proportionately per tenant, by square footage, or another method as substantiated through supporting documentation provided by the landlord to the qualified commercial tenant.

(2) The building operating costs have been incurred within the previous 18 months, or are reasonably expected to be incurred within the next 12 months based on reasonable estimates.

(3) Before the execution of the lease, the landlord
 provides the prospective qualified commercial tenant a paper or electronic notice stating that the tenant may inspect any supporting documentation of building operating costs upon written request pursuant to paragraph (4).

(4) Within 30 days of a written request, the landlord provides the qualified commercial tenant supporting documentation of the previously incurred or reasonably expected building operating costs.

(5) The costs do not include expenses paid by a tenant directly to a third party.

(6) The costs do not include expenses for which a third party, tenant, or insurance reimbursed the landlord.

(b) A landlord of a commercial real property shall not charge a fee to recover any building operating costs from the qualified commercial tenant until
 the landlord provides the qualified commercial tenant supporting documentation.

(c) During the course of a commercial tenancy, the landlord shall not alter the method or formula used to allocate building operating costs to the qualified commercial tenant in a way that increases the qualified commercial tenant’s share of those costs, unless the qualified commercial tenant is provided with written notice of the change in the method or formula with supporting documentation of the basis of the alteration.

(d) In an action for an unlawful detainer, ejectment, or other action to recover possession based on a failure to pay a fee to recover building operating costs, a qualified commercial tenant may raise, as an affirmative defense, that the landlord violated this section.

(e) A landlord of a commercial real property who
 violates this section shall be liable to a qualified commercial tenant in a civil action for all of the following:

(1) Actual damages.

(2) In the courts discretion, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(3) Upon showing that the landlord, lessor, or their agent has acted willfully or with oppression, fraud, or malice both of the following:

(A) Three times the amount of actual damages.

(B) Punitive damages.

(f) The district attorney, city attorney, or county counsel in the jurisdiction in which the commercial real property is located, in the name of the city or county, may seek injunctive relief based on a violation of this
 section.

(g) Any waiver of a right under this section by a qualified commercial tenant shall be void as a matter of public policy.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Building operating costs” means costs that are incurred on behalf of a tenant for the operation, maintenance, or repair of the commercial real property, including, but not limited to, maintenance of common areas, utilities that are not separately metered, and taxes or assessments charged to the landlord pursuant to property ownership.

(2) “Commercial real property” means all real property in this state, except dwelling units subject to this chapter, mobilehomes, as defined in Section 798.3, and recreational vehicles, as defined in Section 799.29.

(3) “Microenterprise” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18000 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Nonprofit organization” means any private nonprofit organization that qualifies under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(5) “Qualified commercial tenant” means a tenant of commercial real property that meets both of the following requirements:

 (A) The tenant is a microenterprise, a restaurant with fewer than 10 employees, or a nonprofit organization with fewer than 20 employees.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), the tenant has provided the landlord, within the previous 12 months, a written
 notice that the tenant is a qualified commercial tenant and a self-attestation regarding the number of employees, at such time the protections under this section come into place.

(ii) Unless the tenancy is from week to week, month to month, or other period less than a month, the tenant provided the notice and self-attestation described in clause (i) before or upon execution of the lease, and annually thereafter, at such time the protections under this section come into place.

(6) “Supporting documentation” means a dated and itemized quote, contract, receipt, or invoice from a licensed contractor or a provider of services that includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(A) A tabulation showing how the costs are allocated among tenants in compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) A signed and dated attestation by the landlord that the documentation and costs are true and correct.

(i) This section shall only apply to the following:

(1) Leases executed or tenancies commenced or renewed on or after January 1, 2025.

(2) A tenancy that is from week to week, month to month, or other period less than a month.

(3) Leases executed or tenancies commenced before January 1, 2025, that do not contain a provision regarding building operating costs.

(j) This section does not apply to assessment levied pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 36600) of Division 18 of the Streets and Highways
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1015, Sec. 4.   (SB 1103)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.

As used in Sections 1951.2 to 1952.6, inclusive:

(a) “Rent” includes charges equivalent to rent.

(b) “Lease” includes a sublease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1951.4, if a lessee of real property breaches the lease and abandons the property before the end of the term or if his right to possession is terminated by the lessor because of a breach of the lease, the lease terminates. Upon such termination, the lessor may recover from the lessee:

(1) The worth at the time of award of the unpaid rent which had been earned at the time of termination;

(2) The worth at the time of award of the amount
by which the unpaid rent which would have been earned after termination until the time of award exceeds the amount of such rental loss that the lessee proves could have been reasonably avoided;

(3) Subject to subdivision (c), the worth at the time of award of the amount by which the unpaid rent for the balance of the term after the time of award exceeds the amount of such rental loss that the lessee proves could be reasonably avoided; and

(4) Any other amount necessary to compensate the lessor for all the detriment proximately caused by the lessee’s failure to perform his obligations under the lease or which in the ordinary course of things would be likely to result therefrom.

(b) The “worth at the time of award” of the amounts referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is computed by allowing interest
at such lawful rate as may be specified in the lease or, if no such rate is specified in the lease, at the legal rate. The worth at the time of award of the amount referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is computed by discounting such amount at the discount rate of the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco at the time of award plus 1 percent.

(c) The lessor may recover damages under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) only if:

(1) The lease provides that the damages he may recover include the worth at the time of award of the amount by which the unpaid rent for the balance of the term after the time of award, or for any shorter period of time specified in the lease, exceeds the amount of such rental loss for the same period that the lessee proves could be reasonably avoided; or

(2) The lessor relet the property
prior to the time of award and proves that in reletting the property he acted reasonably and in a good-faith effort to mitigate the damages, but the recovery of damages under this paragraph is subject to any limitations specified in the lease.

(d) Efforts by the lessor to mitigate the damages caused by the lessee’s breach of the lease do not waive the lessor’s right to recover damages under this section.

(e) Nothing in this section affects the right of the lessor under a lease of real property to indemnification for liability arising prior to the termination of the lease for personal injuries or property damage where the lease provides for such indemnification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.3.

(a) This section applies to real property other than commercial real property, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1954.26. 

(b) Real property shall be deemed abandoned by the lessee, within the meaning of Section 1951.2, and the lease shall terminate if the lessor gives written notice of belief of abandonment as provided in this section and the
lessee fails to give the lessor written notice, prior to the date of termination specified in the lessor’s notice, stating that the lessee does not intend to abandon the real property and stating an address at which the lessee may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the real property.

(c) The lessor may give a notice of belief of abandonment to the lessee pursuant to this section only where the rent on the property has been due and unpaid for at least 14 consecutive days and the lessor reasonably believes that the lessee has abandoned the property. The date of termination of the lease shall be specified in the lessor’s notice and shall be not less than 15 days after the notice is served personally or, if mailed, not less than 18 days after the notice is deposited in the mail.

(d) The lessor’s notice of belief of abandonment shall be personally
delivered to the lessee or sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the lessee at the lessee’s last known address and, if there is reason to believe that the notice sent to that address will not be received by the lessee, also to any other address known to the lessor where the lessee may reasonably be expected to receive the notice.

(e) The notice of belief of abandonment shall be in substantially the following form:Notice of Belief of AbandonmentTo: (Name of lessee/tenant)(Address of lessee/tenant)This notice is given pursuant to Section 1951.3 of the Civil Code concerning the real property leased by you at ________ (state location of the property by address or other sufficient description). The rent on this property has been due and unpaid for 14 consecutive days and the lessor/landlord believes that you have abandoned the property.The real property will be deemed
abandoned within the meaning of Section 1951.2 of the Civil Code and your lease will terminate on ________ (here insert a date not less than 15 days after this notice is served personally or, if mailed, not less than 18 days after this notice is deposited in the mail) unless before that date the lessor/landlord receives at the address indicated below a written notice from you stating both of the following:(1) Your intent not to abandon the real property.(2) An address at which you may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the real property.You are required to pay the rent due and unpaid on this real property as required by the lease, and your failure to do so can lead to a court proceeding against you.Dated: _______ (Signature of lessor/landlord) (Type or print name of lessor/landlord) (Address to which lessee/tenant is to send notice)(f) The real property shall not be deemed to be abandoned pursuant to this section if the lessee proves any of
the following:

(1) At the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given, the rent was not due and unpaid for 14 consecutive days.

(2) At the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given, it was not reasonable for the lessor to believe that the lessee had abandoned the real property. The fact that the lessor knew that the lessee left personal property on the real property does not, of itself, justify a finding that the lessor did not reasonably believe that the lessee had abandoned the real property.

(3) Before the date specified in the lessor’s notice, the lessee gave written notice to the lessor stating the lessee’s intent not to abandon the real property and stating an address at which the lessee may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the real property.

(4) During the period beginning 14 days before the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given and ending on the date the lease would have terminated pursuant to the notice, the lessee paid to the lessor all or a portion of the rent due and unpaid on the real property.

(g) Nothing in this section precludes the lessor or the lessee from otherwise proving that the real property has been abandoned by the lessee within the meaning of Section 1951.2.

(h) Nothing in this section precludes the lessor from serving a notice requiring the lessee to pay rent or quit as provided in Sections 1161 and 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure at any time permitted by those sections, or affects the time and manner of giving any other notice required or permitted by law. The giving of the notice provided by this section does not
satisfy the requirements of Sections 1161 and 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 104, Sec. 2.   (AB 2847)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.35.

(a) This section applies only to commercial real property, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1954.26.

(b) Commercial real property shall be deemed abandoned by the lessee within the meaning of Section 1951.2 and the lease shall terminate if the lessor gives written notice of belief of abandonment pursuant to subdivision (c) and, prior to the date of termination specified in the lessor’s notice of belief
of abandonment, the lessee fails to give the lessor written notice stating that the lessee does not intend to abandon the commercial real property and provides an address at which the lessee may be served by certified mail in an action for unlawful detainer of real property.

(c) The lessor may give notice of belief of abandonment pursuant to this section only if the rent on the property has been due and unpaid for at least the number of days required for the lessor to declare a rent default under the terms of the lease, but in no case less than three days, and the lessor reasonably believes that the lessee has abandoned the property. The date of termination of the lease shall be specified in the notice and shall be not less than 15 days after the notice is served personally, sent to the lessee by an overnight courier service, or deposited in the mail.

(d) The lessor’s notice of
belief of abandonment shall be personally delivered to the lessee, sent by a recognized overnight carrier, or sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the lessee at the lessee’s last known address, and, if there is reason to believe that the notice sent to that address will not be received by the lessee, also to any other address known to the lessor where the lessee may reasonably be expected to receive the notice.

(e) The notice of belief of abandonment shall be in substantially the following form:Notice of Belief of AbandonmentTo: (Name of lessee/tenant)(Address of lessee/tenant)This notice is given pursuant to Section 1951.35 of the Civil Code concerning the real property leased by you at ________ (state location of the property by address or other sufficient description). The rent on this property has been due and unpaid for the number of days necessary to declare a rent default under your lease and the
lessor/landlord believes that you have abandoned the property.The real property will be deemed abandoned within the meaning of Section 1951.2 of the Civil Code and your lease will terminate on ________ (here insert a date not less than 15 days after this notice is served personally, sent by overnight courier service, or deposited in the mail) unless before that date the lessor/landlord receives at the address below a written notice from you stating both of the following:(1) Your intent not to abandon the real property.(2) An address at which you may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the real property.You are required to pay the rent due and unpaid on this real property as required by the lease, and your failure to do so can
lead to a court proceeding against you.Dated: _______ (Signature of lessor/landlord) (Type or print name of lessor/landlord) (Address to which lessee/tenant is to send notice)(f) The real property shall not be deemed to be abandoned pursuant to this section if the lessee provides any of the following:

(1) At the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given, the rent was not due and unpaid for the time period necessary to declare a rent default under the lessee’s lease.

(2) At the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given, it was not reasonable for the lessor to believe that the lessee had abandoned the real property. The fact that the lessor knew that the lessee left personal property on the real property does not, by itself, justify a finding that the lessor did not believe that the lessee had abandoned the real property.

(3) Before the date specified in the lessor’s notice, the lessee gave written notice to the lessor stating the lessee’s intent not to
abandon the real property and provided an address at which the lessee may be served by certified mail in an action for unlawful detainer of real property.

(4) During the period beginning at the start of the applicable rent default period and ending on the date the lease would have terminated pursuant to the notice, the lessee paid to the lessor all or a portion of the rent due and unpaid on the real property.

(g) Nothing in this section precludes the lessor or the lessee from otherwise proving that the real property has been abandoned by the lessee within the meaning of Section 1951.2.

(h) Nothing in this section precludes the lessor from serving a notice requiring the lessee to pay rent or quit as provided in Section 1161 or 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure at any time permitted by those sections, or affects the
time and manner of giving any other notice required or permitted by law. Giving notice pursuant to this section does not satisfy the requirements of Section 1161 or 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 104, Sec. 3.   (AB 2847)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.4.

(a) The remedy described in this section is available only if the lease provides for this remedy. In addition to any other type of provision used in a lease to provide for the remedy described in this section, a provision in the lease in substantially the following form satisfies this subdivision: 

“The lessor has the remedy described in California Civil Code Section 1951.4 (lessor may continue lease in effect after lessee’s breach and abandonment and recover rent as it becomes due, if lessee has right to sublet or assign, subject only to
reasonable limitations).” 

(b) Even though a lessee of real property has breached the lease and abandoned the property, the lease continues in effect for so long as the lessor does not terminate the lessee’s right to possession, and the lessor may enforce all the lessor’s rights and remedies under the lease, including the right to recover the rent as it becomes due under the lease, if any of the following conditions is satisfied: 

(1) The lease permits the lessee, or does not prohibit or otherwise restrict the right of the lessee, to sublet the property, assign the lessee’s interest in the lease, or both. 

(2) The lease permits the lessee to sublet the property, assign the lessee’s interest in the lease, or both, subject to express standards or conditions, provided the standards and conditions are reasonable at the
time the lease is executed and the lessor does not require compliance with any standard or condition that has become unreasonable at the time the lessee seeks to sublet or assign. For purposes of this paragraph, an express standard or condition is presumed to be reasonable; this presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof. 

(3) The lease permits the lessee to sublet the property, assign the lessee’s interest in the lease, or both, with the consent of the lessor, and the lease provides that the consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or the lease includes a standard implied by law that consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. 

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), the following do not constitute a termination of the lessee’s right to possession: 

(1) Acts of maintenance or preservation or
efforts to relet the property. 

(2) The appointment of a receiver upon initiative of the lessor to protect the lessor’s interest under the lease. 

(3) Withholding consent to a subletting or assignment, or terminating a subletting or assignment, if the withholding or termination does not violate the rights of the lessee specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 67, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.5.

Section 1671, relating to liquidated damages, applies to a lease of real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.7.

(a) As used in this section, “advance payment” means moneys paid to the lessor of real property as prepayment of rent, or as a deposit to secure faithful performance of the terms of the lease, or another payment that is the substantial equivalent of either of these. A payment that is not in excess of the amount of one month’s rent is not an advance payment for purposes of this section.

(b) The notice provided by subdivision (c) is required to be given only if all of the
following apply:

(1) The lessee has made an advance payment.

(2) The lease is terminated pursuant to Section 1951.2.

(3) The lessee has made a request, in writing, to the lessor that he or she be given notice under subdivision (c).

(c) Upon the initial reletting of the property, the lessor shall send a written notice to the lessee stating that the property has been relet, the name and address of the new lessee, and the length of the new lease and the amount of the rent. The notice shall be delivered to the lessee personally, or be sent by regular mail to the lessee at the address shown on the request, not later than 30 days after the new lessee takes possession of the property. Notice is not required if the amount of the rent due and unpaid at the time
of termination exceeds the amount of the advance payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.8.

Nothing in Section 1951.2 or 1951.4 affects the right of the lessor under a lease of real property to equitable relief where such relief is appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), nothing in Sections 1951 to 1951.8, inclusive, affects the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, relating to actions for unlawful detainer, forcible entry, and forcible detainer.

(b) Unless the lessor amends the complaint as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1952.3 to state a claim for damages not recoverable in the unlawful detainer proceeding, the bringing of an action under the provisions of Chapter 4
(commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not affect the lessor’s right to bring a separate action for relief under Sections 1951.2, 1951.5, and 1951.8, but no damages shall be recovered in the subsequent action for any detriment for which a claim for damages was made and determined on the merits in the previous action.

(c) After the lessor obtains possession of the property under a judgment pursuant to Section 1174 of the Code of Civil Procedure, he is no longer entitled to the remedy provided under Section 1951.4 unless the lessee obtains relief under Section 1179 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.2.

Sections 1951 to 1952, inclusive, do not apply to:

(a) Any lease executed before July 1, 1971.

(b) Any lease executed on or after July 1, 1971, if the terms of the lease were fixed by a lease, option, or other agreement executed before July 1, 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if the lessor brings an unlawful detainer proceeding and possession of the property is no longer in issue because possession of the property has been delivered to the lessor before trial or, if there is no trial, before judgment is entered, the case becomes an ordinary civil action in which:

(1) The lessor may obtain any relief to which he is entitled, including, where applicable, relief authorized by Section 1951.2; but, if the lessor seeks to recover damages described in paragraph (3) of
subdivision (a) of Section 1951.2 or any other damages not recoverable in the unlawful detainer proceeding, the lessor shall first amend the complaint pursuant to Section 472 or 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure so that possession of the property is no longer in issue and to state a claim for such damages and shall serve a copy of the amended complaint on the defendant in the same manner as a copy of a summons and original complaint is served.

(2) The defendant may, by appropriate pleadings or amendments to pleadings, seek any affirmative relief, and assert all defenses, to which he is entitled, whether or not the lessor has amended the complaint; but subdivision (a) of Section 426.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply unless, after delivering possession of the property to the lessor, the defendant (i) files a cross-complaint or (ii) files an answer or an amended answer in response to an amended complaint filed pursuant to paragraph
(1).

(b) The defendant’s time to respond to a complaint for unlawful detainer is not affected by the delivery of possession of the property to the lessor; but, if the complaint is amended as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the defendant has the same time to respond to the amended complaint as in an ordinary civil action.

(c) The case shall proceed as an unlawful detainer proceeding if the defendant’s default (1) has been entered on the unlawful detainer complaint and (2) has not been opened by an amendment of the complaint or otherwise set aside.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the pleadings that may be filed, relief that may be sought, or defenses that may be asserted in an unlawful detainer proceeding that has not become an ordinary civil action as provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.4.

An agreement for the exploration for or the removal of natural resources is not a lease of real property within the meaning of Sections 1951 to 1952.2, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.6.

(a) Sections 1951 to 1952.2, inclusive, shall not apply to any lease or agreement for a lease of real property between any public entity and any nonprofit corporation whose title or interest in the property is subject to reversion to or vesting in a public entity and which issues bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, the interest on which is exempt from federal income taxes for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or improving the property or a building or other facility thereon, or between any public entity and any other public entity, unless the lease or the agreement shall
specifically provide that Sections 1951 to 1952.2, inclusive, or any portions thereof, are applicable to the lease or the agreement.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a public entity lessee in a contract for a capital lease of real property involving the payment of rents of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more may elect to waive any of the remedies for a breach of the lease provided in Sections 1951 to 1952.2, inclusive, and contract instead for any other remedy permitted by law. As used in this subdivision, “capital lease” refers to a lease entered into for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or improving the property or a building or other facility thereon.

(c) As used in this section, “public entity” includes the state, a county, city and county, city, district, public authority, public agency, or any other political subdivision or public
corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.7.

(a) (1) Any term in a lease that is executed, renewed, or extended on or after January 1, 2015, that conveys any possessory interest in commercial property that either prohibits or unreasonably restricts the installation or use of an electric vehicle charging station in a parking space associated with the commercial property, or that is otherwise in conflict with the provisions of this section, is void and unenforceable.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on the installation of electric vehicle charging stations. However, it is the policy of the state to promote, encourage, and remove obstacles to the use of electric vehicle charging stations.

(3) This subdivision shall not grant the holder of a possessory interest under the lease described in paragraph (1) the right to install electric vehicle charging stations in more parking spaces than are allotted to the leaseholder in his or her lease, or, if no parking spaces are allotted, a number of parking spaces determined by multiplying the total number of parking spaces located at the commercial property by a fraction, the denominator of which is the total rentable square feet at the property, and the numerator of which is the number of total square feet rented by the leaseholder.

(4) If the installation of an electric vehicle charging station has the effect of granting the leaseholder a reserved parking space and a reserved parking space is not allotted to the leaseholder in the lease, the owner of the commercial property may charge a reasonable monthly rental amount for the parking space.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A commercial property where charging stations already exist for use by tenants in a ratio that is equal to or greater than 2 available parking spaces for every 100 parking spaces at the commercial property.

(2) A commercial property where there are less than 50 parking spaces.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Electric vehicle charging station” or “charging station” means a station that is designed in compliance with Article 625 of the California Electrical Code, as it reads on the effective date of this section, and delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle into one or more electric vehicles.

(2) “Reasonable costs” includes, but is not limited to, costs associated with those items specified in the “Permitting Checklist” of the “Zero-Emission Vehicles in California: Community Readiness Guidebook” published by the Office of Planning and Research.

(3) “Reasonable restrictions” or “reasonable standards” are restrictions or standards that do not significantly increase the cost of the electric vehicle charging station or its installation or significantly decrease the charging station’s efficiency or
specified performance.

(d) An electric vehicle charging station shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by state and local authorities as well as all other applicable zoning, land use, or other ordinances, or land use permit requirements.

(e) If lessor approval is required for the installation or use of an electric vehicle charging station, the application for approval shall not be willfully avoided or delayed. The approval or denial of an application shall be in writing.

(f) An electric vehicle charging station installed by a lessee shall satisfy the following provisions:

(1) If lessor approval is required, the lessee first shall obtain approval from the lessor to install the electric vehicle charging station and the
lessor shall approve the installation if the lessee complies with the applicable provisions of the lease consistent with the provisions of this section and agrees in writing to do all of the following:

(A) Comply with the lessor’s reasonable standards for the installation of the charging station.

(B) Engage a licensed contractor to install the charging station.

(C) Within 14 days of approval, provide a certificate of insurance that names the lessor as an additional insured under the lessee’s insurance policy in the amount set forth in paragraph (3).

(2) The lessee shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Costs for damage to property and the charging station resulting from the
installation, maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the charging station.

(B) Costs for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the charging station.

(C) The cost of electricity associated with the charging station.

(3) The lessee at all times, shall maintain a lessee liability coverage policy in the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000), and shall name the lessor as a named additional insured under the policy with a right to notice of cancellation and property insurance covering any damage or destruction caused by the charging station, naming the lessor as its interests may appear.

(g) A lessor may, in its sole discretion, create a new parking space where one did not previously exist to facilitate the installation of an electric
vehicle charging station, in compliance with all applicable laws.

(h) Any installation by a lessor or a lessee of an electric vehicle charging station in a common interest development is also subject to all of the requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 4745.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 4.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.8.

On and after the effective date of this section, no owner of a gasoline service station shall enter into a lease with any person for the leasing of the station for the purpose of operating a gasoline service station, unless (a) the station is equipped with a vapor control system for the control of gasoline vapor emissions during gasoline marketing operations, including storage, transport, and transfer operations, if such vapor control system is required by law or by any rule or regulation of the State Air Resources Board or of the air pollution control district in which the station is located or (b) no vapor control system has been certified by the board prior to the date of the lease.

A lease entered into in violation of this section shall be voidable at the option of the lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.

(a) Any provision of a lease or rental agreement of a dwelling by which the lessee agrees to modify or waive any of the following rights shall be void as contrary to public policy:

(1) His rights or remedies under Section 1950.5 or 1954.

(2) His right to assert a cause of action against the lessor which may arise in the future.

(3) His right to a notice or hearing required by law.

(4) His procedural rights in litigation in any action involving his rights and obligations as a tenant.

(5) His right to have the landlord exercise a duty of care to prevent personal injury or personal property damage where that duty is imposed by law.

(b) Any provision of a lease or rental agreement of a dwelling by which the lessee agrees to modify or waive a statutory right, where the modification or waiver is not void under subdivision (a) or under Section 1942.1, 1942.5, or 1954, shall be void as contrary to public policy unless the lease or rental agreement is presented to the lessee before he takes actual possession of the premises. This subdivision does not apply to any provisions modifying or waiving a statutory right in agreements renewing leases or rental agreements where the same provision was also contained
in the lease or rental agreement which is being renewed. 

(c) This section shall apply only to leases and rental agreements executed on or after January 1, 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.

(a) A landlord may enter the dwelling unit only in the following cases:

(1) In case of emergency.

(2) To make necessary or agreed repairs, decorations, alterations or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers,
mortgagees, tenants, workers, or contractors or to make an inspection pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1950.5.
